Tennessee, session 114, HB1324.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-4-201, is amended by deleting the
section and substituting instead:
Notwithstanding title 48, chapters 51-69 to the contrary, there is created a
nonprofit corporation that is known as the Tennessee student assistance corporation,
which operates as a division within the Tennessee higher education commission, to
administer student assistance programs authorized by law. The corporation must be
registered with the secretary of state and is subject to the corporate laws of this state,
except as provided in this part and parts 3 and 6-9 of this chapter.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-4-202, is amended by deleting the
section and substituting instead:
(a) The governing board of directors for the Tennessee student assistance
corporation as of June 30, 2024, is terminated on July 1, 2025. Effective July 1, 2025,
the Tennessee higher education commission, created by § 49-7-201, shall serve as the
governing board of directors for the Tennessee student assistance corporation.
(b) The Tennessee student assistance corporation shall carry out the purposes
of this part and parts 3 and 6-9 of this chapter. The commission is authorized and
empowered to expend for the necessary administration of this part and parts 3 and 6-9
of this chapter any funds appropriated, received, or allocated for the purposes of this
part and parts 3 and 6-9 of this chapter.
HB1324
002819
- 1 -

SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-4-708(c)(5), is amended by
deleting "or Tennessee college of applied technology".
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-4-902(33)(B), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(B) Culminates in an industry certification, registered apprenticeship,
occupational licensure, or certificate, but does not include participation in, or completion
of, a program of professional development, continuing education, exam preparation, or
similar objectives;
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-4-921(e), is amended by deleting
"certificate or diploma" and substituting instead "QNDC, certificate, or diploma".
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-4-923, is amended by deleting the
section.
SECTION 7. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-4-902(46), is amended by
deleting the language "Wilder-Naifeh technical skills grant" and substituting instead
"TennesseeWORKS scholarship" and redesignating the subdivision appropriately.
SECTION 8. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-4-905, is amended by deleting the
language "Wilder-Naifeh technical skills grant" wherever it appears in subsection (a) and
substituting instead "TennesseeWORKS scholarship" and deleting the language "Wilder-Naifeh
technical skills grants" in subdivision (b)(2) and substituting instead "TennesseeWORKS
scholarships".
SECTION 9. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-4-921, is amended by deleting the
language "Wilder-Naifeh technical skills grant" wherever it appears and substituting instead
"TennesseeWORKS scholarship" and deleting the language "Wilder-Naifeh technical skills
grants" in subsection (e) and substituting instead "TennesseeWORKS scholarships".
- 2 - 002819

SECTION 10. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-4-922, is amended by deleting
the language "Wilder-Naifeh technical skills grant" and substituting instead "TennesseeWORKS
scholarship".
SECTION 11. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-4-937(a), is amended by
deleting the language "Wilder-Naifeh technical skills grant" and substituting instead
"TennesseeWORKS scholarship".
SECTION 12. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-7-202(c), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(4) Serve as the governing board of directors for the Tennessee student
assistance corporation.
SECTION 13. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-247(a), is amended by
deleting subdivision (66) and substituting instead:
(66) The Tennessee student assistance corporation, as governed by the
Tennessee higher education commission, created by § 49-7-201;
SECTION 14. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 002819